Hawaii statutes.
§134-7.2 Prohibition against
seizure of firearms or ammunition during emergency or disaster; suspension of
permit or license. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 127A
or any other law to the contrary, no person or government entity shall seize or
confiscate, under any emergency or disaster relief powers or functions
conferred, or during any emergency period, as defined in section 127A-2, or
during any time of national emergency or crisis, as defined in section 134-34,
any firearm or ammunition from any individual who is lawfully permitted to
carry or possess the firearm or ammunition under part I of this chapter and who
carries, possesses, or uses the firearm or ammunition in a lawful manner and in
accordance with the criminal laws of this State.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 127A
or any other law to the contrary, no person or government entity shall suspend,
revoke, or limit, under any emergency or disaster relief powers or functions
conferred, any lawfully acquired and maintained permit or license obtained
under and in accordance with part I of this chapter.

(c) For purposes of this section,
"government entity" means any unit of government in this State,
including the State and any county or combination of counties, department,
agency, institution, board, commission, district, council, bureau, office,
governing authority, or other instrumentality of state or county government, or
corporation or other establishment owned, operated, or managed by or on behalf
of this State or any county. [L 2010, c 96, §1; am L 2014, c 111, §7]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next